fr: Technologie du stylet: EMR sans batterie; Actif alimenté par batterie; Capacitif; Capacitif passif; Puce intelligente; Autre
hu: Ceruzatechnológia: Akkumulátor nélküli EMR; Akkumulátoros aktív; Kapacitív; Passzív kapacitív; Okos chip; Egyéb
sk-SK: Technológia dotykového pera: EMR bez batérie; Aktívny s batériou; Kapacitný; Pasívny kapacitný; Inteligentný čip; Iné
ro-RO: Tehnologie peniță digitală: EMR fără baterie; Activ alimentat cu baterie; Capacitivă; Capacitiv pasiv; Cip inteligent; Altele
pl: Technologia rysika: EMR bezprzewodowy; Aktywny z baterią; Pojemnościowy; Pasywny pojemnościowy; Inteligentny chip; Inne
cs: Technologie stylusu: EMR bez baterie; Aktivní napájený baterií; Kapacitní; Pasivní kapacitní; Chytrý čip; Jiné
zh-TW: 觸控筆技術: 無電池 EMR; 電池供電主動式; 電容式; 被動電容式; 智慧晶片; 其他
vi: Công nghệ bút cảm ứng: EMR không cần pin; Hoạt động bằng pin; Điện dung; Điện dung thụ động; Chip thông minh; Khác
th: เทคโนโลยีปากกาสไตลัส: EMR แบบไม่ใช้แบตเตอรี่; แอ็คทีฟแบบใช้แบตเตอรี่; คาปาซิทีฟ; คาปาซิทีฟแบบพาสซีฟ; สมาร์ทชิป; อื่นๆ
nl: Stylustechnologie: Batterijvrije EMR; Batterijgevoede actief; Capacitief; Passief capacitief; Slimme chip; Andere
nb: Pekepennteknologi: Batterifri EMR; Batteridrevet aktiv; Kapasitiv; Passiv kapasitiv; Smart-brikke; Annet
fi: Kynän tekniikka: Paristoton EMR; Paristokäyttöinen aktiivinen; Kapasitiivinen; Passiivinen kapasitiivinen; Älysiru; Muu
ru: Технология стилуса: Без батареи EMR; Активный с питанием от батареи; Емкостный; Пассивный ёмкостный; Смарт-чип; Другой
sv: Pennteknik: Batterifri EMR; Batteridriven aktiv; Kapacitiv; Passiv kapacitiv; Smart-chip; Övrigt
lt-LT: Rašiklio technologija: Be baterijos EMR; Aktyvus su baterija; Talpinis; Pasyvus talputinis; Išmanusis lustas; Kita
zh-CN: 触控笔技术: 无电池 EMR; 电池供电主动式; 电容式; 被动电容式; 智能芯片; 其他
it: Tecnologia del pennino: EMR senza batteria; Attivo con batteria; Capacitivo; Capacitivo passivo; Chip intelligente; Altro
es: Tecnología del stylus: EMR sin batería; Activo con batería; Capacitivo; Capacitivo pasivo; Chip inteligente; Otros
tr: Kalem teknolojisi: Pilsiz EMR; Pilli aktif; Kapasitif; Pasif kapasitif; Akıllı çip; Diğer
bg-BG: Технология на писалката: EMR без батерия; Активен с батерия; Капацитивен; Пасивен капацитивен; Интелигентен чип; Други
ja: スタイラス技術: バッテリーフリーEMR; バッテリー駆動アクティブ式; 静電容量式; パッシブ静電容量式; スマートチップ; その他
da: Stylusteknologi: Batterifri EMR; Batteridrevet aktiv; Kapacitiv; Passiv kapacitiv; Smart-chip; Andet
el: Τεχνολογία γραφίδας: EMR χωρίς μπαταρία; Ενεργός με μπαταρία; Χωρητική; Παθητικός χωρητικός; Έξυπνο τσιπ; Άλλο
hr-HR: Tehnologija olovke: EMR bez baterije; Aktivni s baterijom; Kapacitivno; Pasivni kapacitivni; Pametni čip; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tecnologia da caneta stylus: EMR sem bateria; Ativo com bateria; Capacitivo; Capacitivo passivo; Chip inteligente; Outro
sl-SI: Tehnologija pisala: EMR brez baterije; Aktivni z baterijo; Kapacitivna; Pasivni kapacitivni; Pametni čip; Drugo
en: Stylus technology: Battery-free EMR; Battery-powered active; Capacitive; Passive capacitive; Smart-chip; Other
de: Stylus-Technologie: Batteriefreies EMR; Batteriebetrieben aktiv; Kapazitiv; Passiv kapazitiv; Smart-Chip; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tecnologia da caneta stylus: EMR sem bateria; Ativo com bateria; Capacitivo; Capacitivo passivo; Chip inteligente; Outro
ko: 스타일러스 기술: 무배터리 EMR; 배터리 전원 액티브; 정전식; 패시브 정전식; 스마트 칩; 기타